District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.09

Board of Physical Therapy.

(a)

There is established a Board of Physical Therapy to consist of 7 members appointed by the Mayor.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of physical therapy and the practice of athletic training, including practices by physical therapist assistants and by personal fitness trainers.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 4 shall be physical therapists licensed in the District, 2 shall by physical therapy assistants licensed in the District, and 1 shall be a consumer member.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 1 shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 2 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 209, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-220, § 2(b), 53 DCR 10216
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(g), 61 DCR 1184
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 rewrote (b), which previously read, “The Board shall regulate the practice of physical therapy, including practice by physical therapy assistants.”
D.C. Law 16-220, in subsec. (a), increased the size of the Board of Physical Therapy from 5 members to 7 members; in subsec. (b), inserted “including practice by physical therapy assistants”; and, in subsec. (c), substituted “the District, 2 shall be physical therapy assistants licensed in the District” for “the District”.
1981 Ed., § 2-3302.9.
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.